sk-SK: Materiál mincí: Bronz; Meď; Zlato; Nikel; Striebro; Iné
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเหรียญ: สีบรอนซ์; สีทองแดง; โกลด์; นิกเกิล; ซิลเวอร์; อื่นๆ
sv: Mynt - material: Brons; Koppar; Gyllene; Nickel; Silver; Övrigt
pl: Materiał monety: Brąz; Miedź; Złota; Nikiel; Srebrna; Inne
ja: コイン素材: ブロンズ; コッパー; ゴールド; ニッケル; シルバー; その他
zh-TW: 硬幣材質: 銅色; 紅銅色; 金色; 鎳; 銀色; 其他
hu: Érme anyaga: Bronz; Réz; Arany; Nikkel; Ezüst; Egyéb
ko: 코인 소재: 청동색; 구리; 금색; 니켈; 은색; 기타
nl: Materiaal munt: Brons; Koper; Gold; Nikkel; Silver; Andere
vi: Vật liệu tiền xu: Màu đồng; Màu đồng đỏ; Vàng; Niken; Trắng; Khác
tr: Madeni para malzemesi: Bronz; Bakır; Gold; Nikel; Silver; Diğer
da: Møntmateriale: Bronze; Kobber; Guld; Nikkel; Sølv; Andet
el: Υλικό νομίσματος: Ορείχαλκος; Χαλκός; Χρυσός; Νικέλιο; Ασήμι; Άλλο
de: Münzmaterial: Bronze; Kupfer; Gold; Nickel; Silber; Sonstiges
es: Material de la moneda: Bronce; Cobre; Dorado; Níquel; Plateado; Otros
it: Materiale delle monete: Bronzo; Rame; Oro; Nickel; Argento; Altro
fi: Kolikon materiaali: Pronssi; Kupari; Kulta; Nikkeli; Hopea; Muu
bg-BG: Материал за монети: Бронз; Мед; Злато; Никел; Сребро; Други
en: Coin material: Bronze; Copper; Gold; Nickel; Silver; Other
pt-BR: Material da moeda: Bronze; Cobre; Gold; Níquel; Silver; Outro
ru: Материал монеты: Бронза; Медь; Золото; Никель; Серебро; Другое
sl-SI: Material tuljave: Bron; Baker; Zlato; Nikelj; Srebro; Drugo
fr: Matériau de pièce de monnaie: Bronze; Cuivre; Or; Nickel; Argent; Autre
nb: Myntmateriale: Bronse; Kobber; Gull; Nikkel; Sølv; Annet
pt-PT: Material da moeda: Bronze; Cobre; Ouro; Níquel; Prata; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal kovanice: Bronca; Bakar; Zlato; Nikal; Srebro; Ostalo
cs: Materiál mince: Bronzová; Měděná; Zlatá; Nikl; Stříbrná; Jiné
zh-CN: 硬币材质: 青铜色; 铜色; 金色; 镍; 银色; 其他
ro-RO: Material monedă: Bronz; Cupru; Aur; Nichel; Argint; Altele
lt-LT: Monetos medžiaga: Bronza; Varis; Auksas; Nikelis; Sidabras; Kita